Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1508
Joinder of offenses with larceny; finding of guilty on any count.

An indictment for larceny may contain also a count for obtaining the same property by false pretenses, or a count for embezzlement thereof, and for receiving or concealing the same property, knowing it to have been stolen; and the jury may convict of either offense, and may find all or any of the persons indicted guilty of either of the offenses charged in the indictment.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 419, p. 818;

R.S.1913, § 9057;

C.S.1922, § 10081;

C.S.1929, § 29-1508;

R.S.1943, § 29-1508.

Different felonies of same grade, subject to same punishment, may be charged in separate counts. Sheppard v. State, 104 Neb. 709, 178 N.W. 616 (1920).

Prosecution for receiving stolen property may be had in this state although property was stolen in another state. In prosecution for receiving stolen property, it is necessary to allege and prove that defendant knew that property was stolen. Egan v. State, 97 Neb. 731, 151 N.W. 237 (1915).

Information for larceny may contain also a count for receiving the stolen property. Korab v. State, 93 Neb. 66, 139 N.W. 717 (1913); Brown v. State, 88 Neb. 411, 129 N.W. 545 (1911).

Different criminal acts, part of same transaction, may be charged in same indictment. Lawhead v. State, 46 Neb. 607, 65 N.W. 779 (1896).